Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202058-839
Authority; acquisition of property.

The
authority is authorized and empowered, directly or by and through an eligible institution, as its agent, to acquire by purchase, gift,
or devise, such lands, structures, property, real or personal, rights, rights-of-way,
franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, and including existing
facilities of an eligible institution, as it may deem necessary
or convenient for the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, renovation, or operation
of a project, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it
to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between the authority and the owner
thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of the authority or in the
name of an eligible institution as its
agent.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2936;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 36;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1736;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 39.